North Dakota, session 69, HB1348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 54-44.3-20 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
54-44.3-20. Categories of positions in the state service.
All positions in the state service are included in the classified service, except:
1. Each official elected by popular vote and each person appointed to fill vacancies in an
elective office, one principal assistant, and one private secretary.
2. Members of boards and commissions required by law.
3. Administrative heads of departments required by law, other than the superintendent of
the life skills and transition center, the superintendent of North Dakota vision services -
school for the blind, the superintendent of the school for the deaf, and the state
librarian.
4. Officers and employees of the legislative branch of government.
5. Members of the judicial branch of government of the state of North Dakota and their
employees and jurors.
6. Persons temporarily employed in a professional or scientific capacity as consultants or
to conduct a temporary and special inquiry, investigation, or examination for the
legislative branch of government or a department of the state government.
7. Positions deemed to be inappropriate to the classified service due to the special
nature of the position as determined by the division and approved by the board.
Page No. 1 25.0564.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
8. Employees of the institutions of higher education under the control of the state board
of higher education.
9. Members and employees of occupational and professional boards.
10. Officers and employees of the North Dakota mill and elevator association.
11. Positions referred to under law as serving at the pleasure of or at the will of the
appointing authority.
12. Licensed teachers engaged in teaching at the North Dakota youth correctional center,
North Dakota vision services - school for the blind, and the school for the deaf.
13. Officers of workforce safety and insurance.
14. Officers and employees of the department of commerce.
15. Attorneys employed by the insurance commissioner.
16. Engineers, engineering technicians, and geologists employed by the director of
mineral resources.
17. Officers and employees of the Bank of North Dakota.
18. Investment and fiscal operations positions of the state retirement and investment office
necessary for the management of the investment of funds under the control of the
state investment board.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Section 54-52.5-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is repealed.
Page No. 2 25.0564.02000